Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8214
Designation, defined.

Designation means a formal determination by the department that a hospital or health care facility is capable of providing designated trauma care or rehabilitative services as authorized in the Statewide Trauma System Act.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 14.